New York, session 2025-2026, S3103.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of motor vehicles shall conduct a study to 2 review and examine the requirements of motor vehicle and motorcycle 3 safety inspections conducted pursuant to section 301 of the vehicle and 4 traffic law, to ensure the operational safety of such vehicles. Such 5 study shall include, but shall not be limited to, an examination of 6 whether additional inspection items should be included, whether 7 inspection items should be modified, an examination of the maximum fee 8 that the commissioner authorizes to be charged by an official inspection 9 station, and the sufficiency of such fee in balancing the cost of such 10 safety inspections to both consumers and official inspection stations. 11 § 2. No later than one year after the effective date of this act, the 12 commissioner of motor vehicles shall submit a report of such study with 13 the commissioner's findings and recommendations to the governor, the 14 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 15 minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the assembly, the 16 chair of the senate transportation committee, and the chair of the 17 assembly transportation committee. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01108-01-5